Utah statutes.
53A-11-504.   Requirement of school record for transfer of student -- Procedures.

(1)  Except as provided in Section 53A-1-1001, a school shall request a certified copy of a transfer student's record, directly from the transfer student's previous school, within 14 days after enrolling the transfer student.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b) and Section 53A-1-1001, a school requested to forward a certified copy of a transferring student's record to the new school shall comply within 30 school days of the request.

(b)  If the record has been flagged pursuant to Section 53A-11-502, a school may not forward the record to the new school and the requested school shall notify the division of the request.



Amended by Chapter 395, 2010 General Session

